Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3912
Relation to federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of such act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), of such act or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of such act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2007, LB341, § 12.